Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB455.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 3 of this Act:
(1) "Administrative support":
(a) Means tasks performed to assist a licensed professional in the delivery of
therapy or psychotherapy services that do not involve therapeutic
communication; and
(b) Includes but is not limited to:
1. Managing appointment scheduling and reminders;
2. Processing billing and insurance claims; and
3. Drafting general communications related to therapy logistics that do
not include therapeutic communication or advice;
(2) "Artificial intelligence" has the same meaning as in KRS 42.722;
(3) "Consent":
(a) Means a clear, explicit affirmative act by an individual that:
1. Unambiguously communicates the individual's express, freely given,
informed, voluntary, specific, and unambiguous written agreement,
including a written agreement provided by electronic means; and
2. Is revocable by the individual; and
(b) Does not include an agreement that is obtained by:
1. The acceptance of a general or broad terms of use agreement or a
similar document that contains descriptions of artificial intelligence
along with other unrelated information;
2. An individual hovering over, muting, pausing, or closing a given piece
of digital content; or
Page 1 of 6
XXXX 1/20/2026 4:36 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1857
3. Deceptive actions;
(4) "Department" means the Department of Professional Licensing in the Public
Protection Cabinet;
(5) "Licensed professional":
(a) Means an individual who holds a valid license or certificate issued by any
agency of this Commonwealth to provide therapy or psychotherapy services,
including:
1. A licensed psychologist licensed under the provisions of KRS Chapter
319;
2. A licensed clinical social worker licensed under the provisions of KRS
335.100;
3. A certified social worker licensed under the provisions of KRS
335.080;
4. A professional counselor credentialed under the provisions of KRS
335.500 to 335.599;
5. A marriage and family therapist licensed under the provisions of KRS
335.500 to 335.599;
6. A licensed alcohol and drug counselor licensed under the provisions
of KRS 309.080 to 309.089 authorized to provide therapy or
psychotherapy services;
7. An art therapist certified under KRS 309.130;
8. An advanced practice registered nurse licensed under the provisions of
KRS Chapter 314 engaged in providing mental health services; and
9. Any other professional authorized by this Commonwealth through a
license or certificate to provide therapy or psychotherapy services; and
(b) Does not include a physician;
(6) "Peer support" means services provided by individuals with lived experience of
Page 2 of 6
XXXX 1/20/2026 4:36 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1857
mental health conditions or recovery from substance use that are intended to
offer encouragement, understanding, and guidance without clinical intervention;
(7) "Permitted use of artificial intelligence" means the use of artificial intelligence
tools or systems by a licensed professional to assist in providing administrative
support or supplementary support in therapy or psychotherapy services where the
licensed professional maintains full responsibility for all interactions, outputs,
and data use associated with the system and satisfies the requirements of Section
2 of this Act;
(8) "Relevant board" means the applicable state board that licenses, certifies,
regulates, or oversees the specific type of licensed professional;
(9) "Religious counseling" means counseling provided by clergy members, pastoral
counselors, or other religious leaders acting within the scope of their religious
duties if the services are explicitly faith-based and are not represented as clinical
mental health services or therapy or psychotherapy services;
(10) "Supplementary support" includes but is not limited to the:
(a) Preparing and maintaining of client records, including therapy notes;
(b) Analyzing of anonymized data to track client progress or identify trends,
subject to review by a licensed professional; and
(c) Identifying and organizing of external resources or referrals for client use;
(11) "Therapeutic communication":
(a) Means any verbal, nonverbal, or written interaction conducted in a clinical
or professional setting that is intended to diagnose, treat, or address an
individual's mental, emotional, or behavioral health concern; and
(b) Includes but is not limited to:
1. Direct interactions with clients for the purpose of understanding or
reflecting their thoughts, emotions, or experiences;
2. Providing guidance, therapeutic strategies, or interventions designed
Page 3 of 6
XXXX 1/20/2026 4:36 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1857
to achieve mental health outcomes;
3. Offering emotional support, reassurance, or empathy in response to
psychological or emotional distress;
4. Collaborating with clients to develop or modify therapeutic goals or
treatment plans; and
5. Offering behavioral feedback intended to promote psychological
growth or address mental health conditions; and
(12) "Therapy or psychotherapy services":
(a) Means services provided to diagnose, treat, or improve an individual's
mental health or behavioral health; and
(b) Does not include religious counseling or peer support.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A licensed professional:
(a) Shall not use artificial intelligence to assist in providing supplementary
support in therapy or psychotherapy services where the client's therapeutic
session is recorded or transcribed unless:
1. The patient or the patient's legally authorized representative is
informed in writing of the following:
a. That artificial intelligence will be used; and
b. The specific purpose of the artificial intelligence tool or system
that will be used; and
2. The patient or the patient's legally authorized representative provides
consent to the use of artificial intelligence;
(b) May use artificial intelligence only to the extent it is a permitted use of
artificial intelligence and the use meets the requirements of this section;
(c) Shall not allow artificial intelligence to:
Page 4 of 6
XXXX 1/20/2026 4:36 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1857
1. Make independent therapeutic decisions;
2. Directly interact with clients in any form of therapeutic
communication;
3. Generate therapeutic recommendations or treatment plans without
review and approval by the licensed professional; or
4. Detect emotions or mental state; and
(2) An individual, corporation, or entity shall not provide, advertise, or otherwise
offer therapy or psychotherapy services, including through the use of internet-
based artificial intelligence, to the public in this Commonwealth unless the
therapy or psychotherapy services are performed by an individual who is a
licensed professional.
(3) All records kept by a licensed professional and all communications between an
individual seeking therapy or psychotherapy services and a licensed professional
shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed except as required by KRS
210.235.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 367 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Any individual, corporation, or entity found to be in violation of Sections 1 to 3 of
this Act shall pay a civil penalty to the department in an amount not to exceed ten
thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation, as determined by the department, with
penalties assessed based on the degree of harm and the circumstances of the
violation.
(2) A civil penalty shall be:
(a) Assessed by the department after a hearing is held by the relevant board;
and
(b) Paid within sixty (60) days after the date of an order by the relevant board
imposing the civil penalty.
Page 5 of 6
XXXX 1/20/2026 4:36 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1857
(3) The relevant board shall have authority to investigate any actual, alleged, or
suspected violation of Sections 1 to 3 of this Act.
(4) Sections 1 to 3 of this Act do not apply to religious counseling, peer support, or
self-help materials and educational resources that are available to the public and
do not purport to offer therapy or psychotherapy services.
Section 4. Whereas the General Assembly seeks to protect vulnerable
Kentuckians from harm caused by artificial intelligence, an emergency is declared to
exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its
otherwise becoming a law.
Page 6 of 6
XXXX 1/20/2026 4:36 PM Jacketed